Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 8. Shareholders.
§ 13.1-669.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “[all] or [a designated voting group of] shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors,” or words of similar import, means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

Shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a particular meeting unless the meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized.

If a corporation’s articles of incorporation authorize shareholders to cumulate their votes when electing directors, directors may not be elected by written consent pursuant to §

13.1-657

unless it is unanimous.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-193 to 13-198, 13-203, 13.1-32; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1984, c. 366; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2007, c. 165; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subdivision D 2, substituted “the shareholder’s” for “his” and “gives such a” for “gives his,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165 inserted “or the bylaws” in subsection A; and added subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection C, substituted “[all] or [a designated voting group of]” for “all of a designated voting group of”; deleted the designation for subdivision D 1; deleted subdivision D 2, which read: “A shareholder who has the right to cumulate his votes gives notice to the secretary of the corporation not less than 48 hours before the time set for the meeting of the shareholder’s intent to cumulate his votes during the meeting. If one shareholder gives such a notice all other shareholders in the same voting group participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-669.1.
Judicial determination of corporate offices and review of elections and shareholder votes.

Upon application of, or in a proceeding commenced by, a person specified in subsection B, the circuit court in the county or city in which the principal office of the corporation is located, or, if none in the Commonwealth, in the county or city in which its registered office is located may determine:

The result or validity of the election, appointment, removal, or resignation of a director or officer of the corporation;

The right of an individual to hold the office of director or officer of the corporation;

The result or validity of any vote by the shareholders of the corporation;

The right of a director to membership on a committee of the board of directors; and

The right of a person to nominate, or an individual to be nominated as, a candidate for election or appointment as a director of the corporation, and any right under a bylaw adopted pursuant to subsection C of §

13.1-624

or any comparable right under any provision of the articles of incorporation, a contract, or applicable law.

Any application or proceeding pursuant to subsection A may be filed or commenced by any of the following persons:

The corporation;

A record shareholder, beneficial shareholder or unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner of the corporation;

A director of the corporation, an individual claiming the office of director, or a director whose membership on a committee of the board of directors is contested, who, in each case, is seeking a determination of the individual’s right to such office or membership;

An officer of the corporation or an individual claiming to be an officer of the corporation, in each case who is seeking a determination of the individual’s right to such office; or

A person claiming a right covered by subdivision A 5 and who is seeking a determination of such right.

In connection with any application or proceeding under subsection A, the following shall be named as defendants, unless such person made the application or commenced the proceeding:

The corporation;

An individual whose right to office or membership on a committee of the board of directors is contested;

Any individual claiming the office or membership at issue; and

Any person claiming a right covered by subdivision A 5 that is at issue.

In connection with any application or proceeding under subsection A, service of process may be made upon each of the persons specified in subsection C either by:

Serving on the corporation process addressed to such person in any manner provided by statute of the Commonwealth or by rule of the applicable court for service of process on the corporation; or

Serving on such person process in any manner provided by statute of the Commonwealth or by rule of the applicable court.

When service of process is made upon a person other than the corporation by service upon the corporation pursuant to subdivision D 1, the plaintiff and the corporation promptly shall provide written notice of such service, together with copies of all process and the application or complaint, to such person at the person’s last known residence or business address, or as permitted by statute of the Commonwealth, or by rule of the applicable court.

In connection with any application or proceeding under subsection A, the court shall dispose of the application or proceeding on an expedited basis and also may:

Order such additional or further notice as the court deems proper under the circumstances;

Order that additional persons be joined as parties to the proceeding if the court determines that such joinder is necessary for a just adjudication of matters before the court;

Order an election or meeting be held in accordance with the provisions of §

13.1-656

or otherwise;

Appoint a master to conduct an election or meeting;

Enter temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive relief;

Resolve solely for the purpose of the proceeding any legal or factual issues necessary for the resolution of any of the matters specified in subsection A, including the right and power of persons claiming to own shares to vote at any meeting of the shareholders; and

Order such relief as the court determines is equitable, just, and proper.

It shall not be necessary to make shareholders parties to a proceeding or application pursuant to this section unless the shareholder is a required defendant under subdivision C 4, relief is sought against the shareholder individually, or the court orders joinder pursuant to subdivision F 2.

Nothing in this section limits, restricts, or abolishes the subject matter jurisdiction or powers of the court. An application or proceeding pursuant to this section is not the exclusive remedy or proceeding available with respect to the matters specified in subsection A.

History.

2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 1, inserted “result or” preceding “validity”; in subdivision A 3, substituted “any” for “an election or”; rewrote subdivision B 2, which read: “A shareholder of the corporation”; in subdivisions B 3 and 4, substituted “the individual’s” for “his”; in subsection C, substituted “under” for “pursuant to”; in subsection E, added “or by rule of the applicable court” at the end; in subsection H, deleted “as existed prior to July 1, 2015” preceding “An application”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-670.
Voting trusts.

One or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by signing an agreement setting out the provisions of the trust, which may include anything consistent with its purpose, and transferring their shares to the trustee. When a voting trust agreement is signed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all voting trust beneficial owners, together with the number and class or series of shares each transferred to the trust, and deliver copies of the list and agreement to the corporation at its principal office.

A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to the trust are registered in the trustee’s name.

Limits, if any, on the duration of a voting trust shall be as set forth in the voting trust, except that a voting trust that became effective prior to July 1, 2015, is valid for not more than 10 years after its effective date unless some or all of the parties to the voting trust extend it by signing a written consent to the extension.

Any consent to an extension signed by less than all of the parties to the voting trust binds only the parties signing it.The voting trustee shall deliver copies of any consent to extension and the list of beneficial owners to the corporation’s secretary at the corporation’s principal office.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-34; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subsection B, substituted “10 years” for “ten years” and deleted “of this section” following “subsection C”; in subdivision C 1, substituted “10 years” for “ten years” and substituted “a” for “an extension agreement and obtaining the voting trustee’s” in the first sentence, and substituted “not more than 10” for “ten” and “such a consent” for “the extension agreement” in the second sentence; in subdivision C 2, substituted “consent to extension” for “extension agreement” in both sentences, and substituted “A” for “And” at the beginning of the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, deleted “or trustees” following “trustee” twice, substituted “all voting trust beneficial owners, together” for “all owners of beneficial interests in the trust, together,” and substituted “corporation at its” for “corporation’s”; in subsection C, inserted “Limits, if any, on” at the beginning; redesignated former subsection E as the second paragraph of subsection D; in subsection D, in the first paragraph, deleted “pursuant to subsection C” preceding “signed by,” and in the second paragraph, inserted “corporation’s” preceding “secretary”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-671.
Voting agreements.

Two or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by signing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section is not subject to the provisions of §

13.1-670

.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-34; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522.

§ 13.1-671.1.
Shareholder agreements.

An agreement among the shareholders of a corporation that complies with this section is effective among the shareholders and the corporation, even though it is inconsistent with one or more other provisions of this chapter in that it:

Eliminates the board of directors or, subject to the requirements of subsection D of §

13.1-647

and subsection A of §

13.1-693

, one or more officers or restricts the discretion or powers of the board of directors;

Governs the authorization or making of distributions, regardless of whether they are in proportion to ownership of shares, subject to the limitations in §

13.1-653

;

Establishes who shall be directors or officers of the corporation, or their terms of office or manner of selection or removal;

Governs, in general or in regard to specific matters, the exercise or division of voting power by or between the shareholders and directors or by or among any of them, including use of weighted voting rights or director proxies;

Establishes the terms and conditions of any agreement for the transfer or use of property or the provision of services between the corporation and any shareholder, director, officer or employee of the corporation or among any of them;

Transfers to one or more shareholders or other persons all or part of the authority to exercise the corporate powers or to manage the business and affairs of the corporation, including the resolution of any issue about which there exists a deadlock among directors or shareholders;

Requires dissolution of the corporation at the request of one or more of the shareholders or upon the occurrence of a specified event or contingency; or

Otherwise governs the exercise of the corporate powers or the management of the business and affairs of the corporation or the relationship among the shareholders, the directors and the corporation, or among any of them, and is not contrary to public policy.

An agreement authorized by this section shall be:

As set forth (i) in the articles of incorporation or bylaws and approved by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the agreement or (ii) in a written agreement that is signed by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the agreement and is made known to the corporation; and

Subject to amendment only by all persons who are shareholders at the time of the amendment, unless the agreement provides otherwise.

The existence of an agreement authorized by this section shall be noted conspicuously on the front or back of each certificate for outstanding shares or on the information statement required by subsection B of §

13.1-648

. If at the time of the agreement the corporation has shares outstanding represented by certificates, the corporation shall recall the outstanding certificates and issue substitute certificates that comply with this subsection. The failure to note the existence of the agreement on the certificate or information statement shall not affect the validity of the agreement or any action taken pursuant to it. Any purchaser of shares who, at the time of purchase, did not have knowledge of the existence of the agreement shall be entitled to rescission of the purchase. A purchaser shall be deemed to have knowledge of the existence of the agreement if its existence is noted on the certificate or information statement for the shares in compliance with this subsection and, if the shares are not represented by a certificate, the information statement is delivered to the purchaser at or before the time of purchase of the shares. An action to enforce the right of rescission authorized by this subsection must be commenced within the earlier of 90 days after discovery of the existence of the agreement or two years after the time of purchase of the shares.

An agreement authorized by this section shall cease to be effective when the corporation becomes a public corporation. If the agreement ceases to be effective for any reason, the board of directors may, if the agreement is contained or referred to in the corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, adopt an amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws, without shareholder action, to delete the agreement and any references to it.

An agreement authorized by this section that limits the discretion or powers of the board of directors shall relieve the directors of, and impose upon the person or persons in whom such discretion or powers are vested, liability for acts or omissions imposed by law on directors to the extent that the discretion or powers of the directors are limited by the agreement.

The existence or performance of an agreement authorized by this section shall not be a ground for imposing personal liability on any shareholder for the acts or debts of the corporation even if the agreement or its performance treats the corporation as if it were a partnership or results in failure to observe the corporate formalities otherwise applicable to the matters governed by the agreement.

Incorporators or subscribers for shares may act as shareholders with respect to an agreement authorized by this section if no shares have been issued when the agreement is made.

No action taken pursuant to this section shall change any requirement to file articles or other documents with the Commission or affect the rights of any creditors or other third parties.

Limits, if any, on the duration of an agreement authorized by this section shall be as set forth in the agreement, except that the duration of an agreement that became effective prior to July 1, 2015, remains 10 years unless the agreement provided otherwise or is subsequently amended to provide otherwise.

An agreement among shareholders of a corporation that is consistent with the other provisions of this chapter that does not comply with the provisions of this section shall nonetheless be effective among the shareholders and the corporation.

History.

1990, c. 337; 1997, c. 226; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765, in subdivision A 1, inserted “subject to the requirements of subsection D of §

13.1-647

and subsection A of §

13.1-693

, one or more officers or” and added “or one or more officers” at the end; substituted “10 years” for “ten years” in subdivision B 3; substituted “90 days” for “ninety days” in the last sentence of subsection C; and substituted “becomes a public corporation” for “has more than 300 shareholders of record” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 deleted former subdivision B 3, which read “Valid for 10 years, unless the agreement provides otherwise”; added subsections I and J; and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 1, deleted “or one or more officers” at the end; in subdivision A 2, substituted “regardless of whether they are” for “regardless of whether or not”; in subdivision B 1, inserted “and is made known to the corporation” following “the agreement”; in subsection G, substituted “have been issued when the agreement is” for “were issued when the agreement was”; in subsection I, inserted “Limits, if any, on” at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1991 survey of business and corporate law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 627 (1991).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 41 (2011).

§ 13.1-672.
Repealed by Acts 1992, c. 802.

Cross references.

For present provisions relating to derivative proceedings, see §

13.1-672.1

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-672

, relating to procedure in derivative proceedings, was enacted by Acts 1985, c. 522.